Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-253
Annual meeting.

(MBCA 7.01) (a) Unless directors are elected
by written consent in lieu of an annual meeting as permitted by section 21-256,
a corporation shall hold a meeting of shareholders annually at a time stated
in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, except that directors may not be
elected by less than unanimous consent.

(b) Annual shareholders'
meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed
in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated in or fixed in accordance
with the bylaws, annual meetings shall be held at the corporation's principal
office.

(c)
The failure to hold an annual meeting at the time stated in or fixed in accordance
with a corporation's bylaws does not affect the validity of any corporate
action.

(d)
Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a corporation registered as
an investment company under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, as
amended, 15 U.S.C. 80a-l et seq., which, pursuant to section 21-220, has included
in its articles of incorporation a provision limiting or eliminating the requirement
to hold an annual meeting of the shareholders, is not required to hold an
annual meeting of the shareholders except as provided in such articles of
incorporation or as otherwise required by such act and the rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated under such act.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 53.
January 1, 2016